Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COALITION OF ASIAN AMERICAN LEADERS.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Coalition of Asian American Leaders to support outreach, training, technical assistance, peer network development, and direct financial assistance for Asian Minnesotan women entrepreneurs and Asian-owned businesses. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end